California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 inclusive, or (V) or (W) of paragraph (1) and is entitled to access under the other state law or federal law or regulation without a court order, all those seeking access, pursuant to other authorization, to portions of, or information relating to the contents of, juvenile case files protected under another state law or federal law or regulation, shall petition the juvenile court. The juvenile court may only release the portion of, or information relating to the contents of, juvenile case files
 protected by another state law or federal law or regulation if disclosure is not detrimental to the safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of a child, minor, or person who is directly or indirectly connected to the juvenile case that is the subject of the petition. This paragraph does not limit the ability of the juvenile court to carry out its duties in conducting juvenile court proceedings.

(B) Prior to the release of the juvenile case file or any portion thereof, the court shall afford due process, including a notice of, and an opportunity to file an objection to, the release of the record or report to all interested parties.

(C) This paragraph does not limit or repeal any other applicable legal standard or protections designed to safeguard
 private, confidential, or privileged information.

(4) A juvenile case file, any portion thereof, and information relating to the content of the juvenile case file, may not be disseminated by the receiving persons or agencies to a person or agency, other than a person or agency authorized to receive documents pursuant to this section. Further, a juvenile case file, any portion thereof, and information relating to the content of the juvenile case file, may not be made as an attachment to any other documents without the prior approval of the presiding judge of the juvenile court, unless it is used in connection with, and in the course of, a criminal investigation or a proceeding brought to declare a person a dependent child or ward of the juvenile
 court, or as authorized by subparagraph (W) of paragraph (1).

(5) Individuals listed in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), (H), (I), (J), (P), (S), (T), (U), (V), and (W) of paragraph (1) may also receive copies of the case file. For authorized staff of entities who are licensed by the State Department of Social Services, the confidential information shall be obtained through a child protective agency, as defined in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1). In these circumstances, the requirements of paragraph (4) shall continue to apply to the information received.

(6) An individual other than a person described in subparagraphs (A) to (P), inclusive, of paragraph (1) who files a notice of appeal or petition for writ challenging a juvenile court order, or who is a respondent
 in that appeal or real party in interest in that writ proceeding, may, for purposes of that appeal or writ proceeding, inspect and copy any records in a juvenile case file to which the individual was previously granted access by the juvenile court pursuant to subparagraph (Q) of paragraph (1), including any records or portions thereof that are made a part of the appellate record. The requirements of paragraph (3) shall continue to apply to any other record, or a portion thereof, in the juvenile case file or made a part of the appellate record. The requirements of paragraph (4) shall continue to apply to files received pursuant to this paragraph. The Judicial Council shall adopt rules to implement this paragraph.

(b) (1) While the Legislature reaffirms its belief that juvenile court records, in general, should be
 confidential, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision to provide for a limited exception to juvenile court record confidentiality to promote more effective communication among juvenile courts, family courts, law enforcement agencies, and schools to ensure the rehabilitation of juvenile criminal offenders as well as to lessen the potential for drug use, violence, other forms of delinquency, and child abuse.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), written notice that a minor enrolled in a public school, kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, has been found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have committed a felony or misdemeanor involving curfew, gambling, alcohol, drugs, tobacco products, carrying of weapons, a sex offense listed in Section 290 of the Penal Code, assault or battery, larceny,
 vandalism, or graffiti shall be provided by the court, within seven days, to the superintendent of the school district of attendance. Written notice shall include only the offense found to have been committed by the minor and the disposition of the minor’s case. This notice shall be expeditiously transmitted by the district superintendent to the principal at the school of attendance. The principal shall expeditiously disseminate the information to those counselors directly supervising or reporting on the behavior or progress of the minor. In addition, the principal shall disseminate the information to any teacher or administrator directly supervising or reporting on the behavior or progress of the minor whom the principal believes needs the information to work with the pupil in an appropriate fashion to avoid being needlessly vulnerable or to protect other persons from needless vulnerability.

(B) Any information received by a teacher, counselor, or administrator under this subdivision shall be received in confidence for the limited purpose of rehabilitating the minor and protecting students and staff, and shall not be further disseminated by the teacher, counselor, or administrator, except insofar as communication with the juvenile, the juvenile’s parents or guardians, law enforcement personnel, and the juvenile’s probation officer is necessary to effectuate the juvenile’s rehabilitation or to protect students and staff.

(C) An intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this paragraph is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(3) If a minor is
 removed from public school as a result of the court’s finding described in subdivision (b), the superintendent shall maintain the information in a confidential file and shall defer transmittal of the information received from the court until the minor is returned to public school. If the minor is returned to a school district other than the one from which the minor came, the parole or probation officer having jurisdiction over the minor shall so notify the superintendent of the last district of attendance, who shall transmit the notice received from the court to the superintendent of the new district of attendance.

(c) Each probation report filed with the court concerning a minor whose record is subject to dissemination pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include on the face sheet the school at which the minor is currently enrolled. The county
 superintendent shall provide the court with a listing of all of the schools within each school district, within the county, along with the name and mailing address of each district superintendent.

(d) (1) Each notice sent by the court pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be stamped with the instruction: “Unlawful Dissemination Of This Information Is A Misdemeanor.” Any information received from the court shall be kept in a separate confidential file at the school of attendance and shall be transferred to the minor’s subsequent schools of attendance and maintained until the minor graduates from high school, is released from juvenile court jurisdiction, or reaches 18 years of age, whichever occurs first. After that time, the confidential record shall be destroyed. At any time after the date by which a record required to be
 destroyed by this section should have been destroyed, the minor or the minor’s parent or guardian shall have the right to make a written request to the principal of the school that the minor’s school records be reviewed to ensure that the record has been destroyed. Upon completion of the requested review and no later than 30 days after the request for the review was received, the principal or a designee shall respond in writing to the written request and either shall confirm that the record has been destroyed or, if the record has not been destroyed, shall explain why destruction has not yet occurred.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), liability shall not attach to a person who transmits or fails to transmit notice or information required under subdivision (b).

(e) For purposes of this section, a “juvenile case file” means a petition filed in a juvenile court proceeding, reports of the probation officer, and all other records, including any writing as defined in Section 250 of the Evidence Code, or electronically stored information relating to the minor, that is filed in that case or made available to the probation officer in making the probation officer’s report, or to the judge, referee, or other hearing officer, and thereafter retained by the probation officer, judge, referee, or other hearing officer.

(f) The persons described in subparagraphs (A), (E), (F), (H), (K), (L), (M), and (N) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) include persons serving in a similar capacity for an Indian tribe, reservation, or tribal court when the case file involves a child who is a member of, or who is eligible
 for membership in, that tribe.

(g) Any portion of a case file that is covered by, or included in, an order of the court sealing a record pursuant to Section 781 or 786, or that is covered by a record sealing requirement pursuant to Section 786.5 or 827.95, may not be inspected, except as specified by those sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.   (SB 413)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

827.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a city, county, or city and county may establish a computerized data base system within that city, county, or city and county that permits the probation department, law enforcement agencies, and school districts to access probation department, law enforcement, school district, and juvenile court information and records which are nonprivileged and where release is authorized under state or federal law or regulation, regarding minors under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602 or for whom a program of supervision has been undertaken where a petition could otherwise be filed pursuant to Section 602.

(b) Each city, county, or city and county permitting computer access to these agencies shall develop security procedures by which unauthorized personnel cannot access data contained in the system as well as procedures or devices to secure data from unauthorized access or disclosure. The right of access granted shall not include the right to add, delete, or alter data without the written permission of the agency holding the data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 343, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

827.10.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 827, the child welfare agency is authorized to permit its files and records relating to a minor, who is the subject of either a family law or a probate guardianship case involving custody or visitation issues, or both, to be inspected by, and to provide copies to, the following persons, if these persons are actively participating in the family law or probate case:

(1) The judge, commissioner, or other hearing officer assigned to the family law or probate case.

(2) The parent or guardian of the minor.

(3) An attorney for a party to the family law or
 probate case.

(4) A family court mediator assigned to a case involving the minor pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 3160) of Chapter 11 of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Family Code.

(5) A court-appointed investigator, evaluator, or a person conducting a court-connected child custody evaluation, investigation, or assessment pursuant to Section 3111 or 3118 of the Family Code or Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of the Probate Code.

(6) Counsel appointed for the minor in the family law case pursuant to Section 3150 of the Family Code. Prior to allowing counsel appointed for the minor in the family law case to inspect the file, the court clerk may require counsel to provide a certified copy of the court order appointing him or her as the counsel for the minor.

(b) If the child welfare agency files or records, or any portions thereof, are privileged or confidential pursuant to any other state law, except Section 827, or federal law or regulation, the requirements of that state law or federal law or regulation prohibiting or limiting release of the child welfare agency files or records, or any portions thereof, shall prevail.

(c) A social worker may testify in any family or probate proceeding with regard to any information that may be disclosed under this section.

(d) Any records or information obtained pursuant to this section, including the testimony of a social worker, shall be maintained solely in the confidential portion of the family law or probate file.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 352, Sec. 21.   (AB 939)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

827.11.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure quality care for children and youth who are placed in the continuum of foster care settings.

(2) Attracting and retaining quality caregivers is critical to achieving positive outcomes for children, youth, and families, and to ensuring the success of child welfare improvement efforts.

(3) Quality caregivers strengthen foster care by ensuring that a foster or relative family caring for a child provides the loving, committed, and
 skilled care that the child needs, while working effectively with the child welfare system to reach the child’s goals.

(4) Caregivers who are informed of the child’s educational, medical, dental, and mental health history and current needs are better able to meet those needs and address the effects of trauma, increasing placement stability and improving permanency outcomes.

(5) Sharing necessary information with the caregiver is a critical component of effective service delivery for children and youth in foster care.

(b) Therefore, consistent with state and federal law, information shall be provided to a caregiver regarding the child’s or youth’s educational, medical, dental, and mental health history and current needs.

(c) This section is declaratory of existing law and is not intended to impose a new program or higher level of service upon any local agency. It is intended, however, that this restatement of existing law should engender a renewed sense of commitment to engaging foster parents in order to provide quality care to children and youth in foster care.

(d) No later than January 1, 2017, the department shall consult with representatives of the County Counsels’ Association of California, County Welfare Directors Association of California, and stakeholders to develop regulations or identify policy changes necessary to allow for the sharing of information as described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 52.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

827.12.

(a) (1) Records contained in a juvenile delinquency case file may be accessed by a law enforcement agency, probation department, court, the Department of Justice, or other state or local agency that has custody of the case file and juvenile record for the limited purpose of complying with data collection or data reporting requirements that are imposed under the terms of a grant or by another state or federal law. However, personally identifying information contained in a juvenile delinquency case file accessed under this subdivision shall not be released, disseminated, or published by or through an agency, department, court, or individual that has accessed or obtained information from the juvenile delinquency case file.

(2) Upon request of the chief probation officer, the juvenile court may authorize a probation department to access and provide data contained in juvenile delinquency case files and related juvenile records in the possession of the probation department for the purpose of data sharing or conducting or facilitating research on juvenile justice populations, practices, policies, or trends, if both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The court is satisfied that the research, evaluation, or study includes a sound methodology for the appropriate protection of the confidentiality of an individual whose juvenile delinquency case file is accessed pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) Personally identifying information relating to the individual whose juvenile delinquency case file is accessed pursuant to this subdivision is not further released, disseminated, or published by
 the probation department or by or through a program evaluator, researcher, or research organization that is retained by the department for research or evaluation purposes.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “personally identifying information” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1798.79.8 of the Civil Code.

(b) (1) If information from a juvenile delinquency case record is being released for the purposes of human subject research, as defined in Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the probation department shall, after receiving authorization from the court but prior to the release of any information, enter into a formal agreement with the entity or entities conducting the research or evaluation that specifies what may and may not be done with the information disclosed.

(2) All human subject research governed by Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be conducted in compliance with the protections set forth therein.

(c) The probation department shall not disclose any dependency information contained in a juvenile delinquency case record that pertains to a child who is currently receiving, or has previously received, public social services administered by the State Department of Social Services unless it has complied with the requirements for disclosure of that information set forth in Section 10850.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 462, Sec. 1.   (SB 462)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

827.14.

Notwithstanding Section 827, a county welfare or probation department may disseminate information from the juvenile case file to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children as necessary for the county welfare or probation department to carry out its duties required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 11166 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 7.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

827.15.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 827, whenever the juvenile court of a county has made a determination pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (f) of Section 305.5 that a child custody proceeding of an Indian child is to be transferred to the jurisdiction of a tribal court the child case file shall be transferred to the tribe.

(b) If an Indian child is under the jurisdiction of a Title IV-E tribe or a Tribal Title IV-E agency, federal law requires the safeguarding of information as set forth in 45 C.F.R 205.50.

(c) In all other transfers, the juvenile court shall order the release of the child’s case file provided that
 the tribe agrees to maintain the documentation confidential consistent with state and federal law.

(d) As used in this section, a “child case file” means information including the juvenile case file retained by the juvenile court and the child welfare agency files or records retained by the county. For Title IV-E tribes or a Tribal Tile IV-E agency that information includes, but need not be limited to, the documentation set forth in 45 C.F.R. 1356.67.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 772, Sec. 14.   (SB 1460)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

827.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 827 or any other provision of law, written notice that a minor has been found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have committed any felony pursuant to Section 602 shall be provided by the court within seven days to the sheriff of the county in which the offense was committed and to the sheriff of the county in which the minor resides. Written notice shall include only that information regarding the felony offense found to have been committed by the minor and the disposition of the minor’s case. If at any time thereafter the court modifies the disposition of the minor’s case, it shall also notify the sheriff as provided above. The sheriff may disseminate the information to other law enforcement personnel upon request, provided that he or she reasonably believes that the release of this information is generally relevant to the prevention or control of juvenile crime.

(b) Any information received pursuant to this section shall be received in confidence for the limited law enforcement purpose for which it was provided and shall not be further disseminated except as provided in this section. An intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), a law enforcement agency may disclose to the public or to any interested person the information received pursuant to subdivision (a) regarding a minor 14 years of age or older who was found by the court to have committed any felony enumerated in subdivision (b) of Section 707. The law enforcement agency shall not release this information if the court for good cause, with a written statement of reasons, so orders.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

827.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law except Sections 389 and 781 of this code and Section 1203.45 of the Penal Code, a law enforcement agency may disclose the name of any minor 14 years of age or older taken into custody for the commission of any serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code, and the offenses allegedly committed, upon the request of interested persons, following the minor’s arrest for that offense.

(History: Amended March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

827.6.

A law enforcement agency may release the name, description, and the alleged offense of any minor alleged to have committed a violent offense, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, and against whom an arrest warrant is outstanding, if the release of this information would assist in the apprehension of the minor or the protection of public safety. Neither the agency nor the city, county, or city and county in which the agency is located shall be liable for civil damages resulting from release of this information.

(History: Amended March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

827.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 827 or any other provision of law, written notice that a minor has been found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have committed any felony pursuant to Section 602 shall be provided by the court within seven days to the sheriff of the county in which the offense was committed and to the sheriff of the county in which the minor resides. Written notice shall include only that information regarding the felony offense found to have been committed by the minor and the disposition of the minor’s case. If at any time thereafter the court modifies the disposition of the minor’s case, it shall also notify the sheriff as provided above. The sheriff may disseminate the information to other law enforcement personnel upon request, provided that he or she reasonably believes that the release of this information is generally relevant to the prevention or control of juvenile crime.

Any information received pursuant to this section shall be received in confidence for the limited law enforcement purpose for which it was provided and shall not be further disseminated except as provided in this section. An intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) In the written notice provided pursuant to this section, a court may authorize a sheriff who receives information under this section to disclose this information where the release of the information is imperative for the protection of the public and the offense is a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 827.1 (as added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 422) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 996, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

827.9.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to reaffirm its belief that records or information gathered by law enforcement agencies relating to the taking of a minor into custody, temporary custody, or detention (juvenile police records) should be confidential. Confidentiality is necessary to protect those persons from being denied various opportunities, to further the rehabilitative efforts of the juvenile justice system, and to prevent the lifelong stigma that results from having a juvenile police record. Although these records generally should remain confidential, the Legislature recognizes that certain circumstances require the release of juvenile police records to specified persons and entities. The purpose of this section is to clarify the
 persons and entities entitled to receive a complete copy of a juvenile police record, to specify the persons or entities entitled to receive copies of juvenile police records with certain identifying information about other minors removed from the record, and to provide procedures for others to request a copy of a juvenile police record. This section does not govern the release of police records involving a minor who is the witness to or victim of a crime who is protected by other laws including, but not limited to, Section 841.5 of the Penal Code, Section 11167 et seq. of the Penal Code, and the provisions listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 389, 781, and 786 of this code or Section 1203.45 of the Penal Code, a law enforcement agency shall release, upon request, a complete copy of a juvenile police
 record, as defined in subdivision (m), without notice or consent from the person who is the subject of the juvenile police record to the following persons or entities:

(1) Other law enforcement agencies including the office of the Attorney General of California, any district attorney, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, including the Division of Juvenile Justice, and any peace officer as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1 of the Penal Code.

(2) School district police.

(3) Child protective agencies as defined in Section 11165.9 of the Penal Code.

(4) The attorney representing the juvenile who is the subject of the juvenile police
 record in a criminal or juvenile proceeding.

(5) The Department of Motor Vehicles.

(c) Except as provided in Sections 389, 781, and 786 of this code or Section 1203.45 of the Penal Code, law enforcement agencies shall release, upon request, a copy of a juvenile police record to the following persons and entities only if identifying information pertaining to any other juvenile, within the meaning of subdivision (n), has been removed from the record:

(1) The person who is the subject of the juvenile police record.

(2) The parents or guardian of a minor who is the subject of the juvenile police record.

(3) An attorney for a parent or guardian of a minor who is the subject of the juvenile police record.

(d) (1) (A) If a person or entity listed in subdivision (c) seeks to obtain a complete copy of a juvenile police record that contains identifying information concerning the taking into custody or detention of any other juvenile, within the meaning of subdivision (n), who is not a dependent child or a ward of the juvenile court, that person or entity shall submit a completed Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency, as developed pursuant to subdivision (i), to the appropriate law enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency shall send a notice to the following persons that a Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency has been submitted to the agency:

(i) The juvenile about whom information is sought.

(ii) The parents or guardian of any minor described in clause (i). The law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to obtain the address of the parents or guardian.

(B) For purposes of responding to a request submitted pursuant to this subdivision, a law enforcement agency may check the Juvenile Automated Index or may contact the juvenile court to determine whether a person is a dependent child or a ward of the juvenile court and whether parental rights have been terminated or the juvenile has been emancipated.

(C) The notice sent pursuant to this subdivision shall include the following information:

(i) The identity of the person or entity requesting a copy of the juvenile police record.

(ii) A copy of the completed Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency.

(iii) The time period for submitting an objection to the law enforcement agency, which shall be 20 days if notice is provided by mail or confirmed fax, or 15 days if notice is provided by personal service.

(iv) The means to submit an objection.

A law enforcement agency shall issue notice pursuant to this section within 20 days of the request. If no objections are filed, the law enforcement agency shall release the juvenile police record within
 15 days of the expiration of the objection period.

(D) If any objections to the disclosure of the other juvenile’s information are submitted to the law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency shall send the completed Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency, the objections, and a copy of the requested juvenile police record to the presiding judge of the juvenile court or, in counties with no presiding judge of the juvenile court, the judge of the juvenile court or the judge’s designee, to obtain authorization from the court to release a complete copy of the juvenile police record.

(2) If a person or entity listed in subdivision (c) seeks to obtain a complete copy of a juvenile police record that contains identifying information concerning the taking into custody or
 detention of any other juvenile, within the meaning of subdivision (n), who is a dependent child or a ward of the juvenile court, that person or entity shall submit a Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency, as developed pursuant to subdivision (i), to the appropriate law enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency shall send that Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency and a completed petition for authorization to release the information to that person or entity along with a complete copy of the requested juvenile police record to the presiding judge of the juvenile court, or, in counties with no presiding judge of the juvenile court, the judge of the juvenile court or the judge’s designees. The juvenile court shall provide notice of the petition for authorization to the following persons:

(A) If the person
 who would be identified if the information is released is a minor who is a dependent child of the juvenile court, notice of the petition shall be provided to the following persons:

(i) The minor.

(ii) The attorney of record for the minor.

(iii) The parents or guardian of the minor, unless parental rights have been terminated.

(iv) The child protective agency responsible for the minor.

(v) The attorney representing the child protective agency responsible for the minor.

(B) If the person who would be identified if the information is released
 is a ward of the juvenile court, notice of the petition shall be provided to the following:

(i) The ward.

(ii) The attorney of record for the ward.

(iii) The parents or guardian of the ward if the ward is under 18 years of age, unless parental rights have been terminated.

(iv) The district attorney.

(v) The probation department.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section or in Sections 389, 781, and 786 of this code or Section 1203.45 of the Penal Code, law enforcement agencies shall release copies of juvenile police records to any other
 person designated by court order upon the filing of a Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency with the juvenile court. The petition shall be filed with the presiding judge of the juvenile court, or, in counties with no presiding judge of the juvenile court, the judge of the juvenile court or the judge’s designee, in the county where the juvenile police record is maintained.

(f) (1) After considering the petition and any objections submitted to the juvenile court pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (d), the court shall determine whether the law enforcement agency may release a complete copy of the juvenile police record to the person or entity that submitted the request.

(2) In determining whether to authorize the release of a juvenile
 police record, the court shall balance the interests of the juvenile who is the subject of the record, the petitioner, and the public. The juvenile court may issue orders prohibiting or limiting the release of information contained in the juvenile police record. The court may also deny the existence of a juvenile police record where the record is properly sealed or the juvenile who is the subject of the record has properly denied its existence.

(3) Prior to authorizing the release of any juvenile police record, the juvenile court shall ensure that notice and an opportunity to file an objection to the release of the record has been provided to the juvenile who is the subject of the record or who would be identified if the information is released, that person’s parents or guardian if the person is under 18 years of age, and any
 additional person or entity described in subdivision (d), as applicable. The period for filing an objection shall be 20 days from the date notice is given if notice is provided by mail or confirmed fax and 15 days from the date notice is given if notice is provided by personal service. If review of the petition is urgent, the petitioner may file a motion with the presiding judge of the juvenile court showing good cause why the objection period should be shortened. The court shall issue a ruling on the completed petition within 15 days of the expiration of the objection period.

(g) Any out-of-state entity comparable to the California entities listed in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) shall file a petition with the presiding judge of the juvenile court in the county where the juvenile police record is maintained in order to
 receive a copy of a juvenile police record. A petition from that entity may be granted on an ex parte basis.

(h) Nothing in this section shall require the release of confidential victim or witness information protected by other laws including, but not limited to, Section 841.5 of the Penal Code, Section 11167 et seq. of the Penal Code, and the provisions listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code.

(i) The Judicial Council, in consultation with the California Law Enforcement Association of Record Supervisors (CLEARS), shall develop forms for distribution by law enforcement agencies to the public to implement this section. Those forms shall include, but are not limited to, the Petition to Obtain Report of Law Enforcement Agency. The material for the public shall include information
 about the persons who are entitled to a copy of the juvenile police record and the specific procedures for requesting a copy of the record if a petition is necessary. The Judicial Council shall provide law enforcement agencies with suggested forms for compliance with the notice provisions set forth in subdivision (d).

(j) Any information received pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, and (g) of this section shall be received in confidence for the limited purpose for which it was provided and shall not be further disseminated. An intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(k) A court shall consider any information relating to the taking of a minor into custody, if the
 information is not contained in a record that has been sealed, for purposes of determining whether an adjudication of the commission of a crime as a minor warrants a finding that there are circumstances in aggravation pursuant to Section 1170 of the Penal Code or to deny probation.

(l) When a law enforcement agency has been notified pursuant to Section 1155 that a minor has escaped from a secure detention facility, the law enforcement agency shall release the name of, and any descriptive information about, the minor to a person who specifically requests this information. The law enforcement agency may release the information on the minor without a request to do so if it finds that release of the information would be necessary to assist in recapturing the minor or that it would be necessary to protect the public from substantial
 physical harm.

(m) For purposes of this section, a “juvenile police record” refers to records or information relating to the taking of a minor into custody, temporary custody, or detention.

(n) For purposes of this section, with respect to a juvenile police record, “any other juvenile” refers to additional minors who were taken into custody or temporary custody, or detained and who also could be considered a subject of the juvenile police record.

(o) An evaluation of the efficacy of the procedures for the release of police records containing information about minors as described in this section shall be conducted by the juvenile court and law enforcement in Los Angeles County and the results of that evaluation shall be
 reported to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2006.

(p) This section shall only apply to Los Angeles County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 433.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

827.95.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 827.9, a law enforcement agency in this state shall not release a copy of a juvenile police record if the subject of the juvenile police record is any of the following:

(A) A minor who has been diverted by police officers from arrest, citation, detention, or referral to probation or any district attorney, and who is currently participating in a diversion program or has satisfactorily completed a diversion program.

(B) A minor who has been counseled and released by police officers without an arrest, citation, detention, or referral to probation or any district attorney,
 and for whom no referral to probation has been made within 60 days of the release.

(C) A minor who does not fall within the jurisdiction of the juvenile delinquency court under current state law.
